Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2936
Request for mediation, specialized alternative dispute resolution, or other alternative dispute resolution process; information provided to parties.

An individual party, a guardian ad litem, or a social service agency may request that a custody, parenting time, visitation, other access, or related matter proceed to mediation, specialized alternative dispute resolution, or other alternative dispute resolution process at any time prior to the filing or after the filing of an action with a court. Upon receipt of such request, each mediator, court conciliation program, or approved mediation center shall provide information about mediation and specialized alternative dispute resolution to each party.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 17;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 64.